Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.376.010 and 2012 c 122 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Agency action" means projects proposed in state-funded construction or acquisition projects covered by executive order 21-02.(2) "Indian tribe" means any federally recognized Indian tribe ((whose))with traditional lands and territories ((included parts of))in Washington.(2) "State agency" means an agency, department, office, or the office of a statewide elected official, of the state of Washington.(3) "Traditional" refers to those beliefs, customs, and practices of an Indian tribe that have been passed down through generations and the places associated with those beliefs, customs, and practices.(4) "Tribal traditional cultural place" is any geophysical or geographical place, area, or feature, associated with the cultural practices, traditions, beliefs, lifeways, arts, crafts, or social institutions of an Indian tribe.(5) "Undue burden" means any material, significant, or sustained impairment, disruption, restriction, or diminishment of a tribal traditional cultural practice, or of the integrity, continuity, condition, or accessibility of a tribal cultural place, including direct or cumulative impacts.Sec. 2. RCW 43.376.020 and 2022 c 253 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:In establishing a government-to-government relationship with Indian tribes, state agencies must:(1) Make reasonable efforts to collaborate with Indian tribes in the development of policies, agreements, and program implementation that directly affect Indian tribes and develop a mutually agreed upon consultation process that is used by the agency for issues involving specific Indian tribes. Covered agencies, as defined in RCW 70A.02.010, subject to the requirements of chapter 70A.02 RCW, must offer consultation with Indian tribes on the actions specified in RCW 70A.02.100. State agencies described in RCW 70A.65.305 must offer consultation with Indian tribes on the actions specified in RCW 70A.65.305;(2) Before taking any agency action that may affect a tribal traditional cultural place, comply with the consultation requirements of executive order 21-02;(3) Designate a tribal liaison who reports directly to the head of the state agency;(((3)))(4) Ensure that tribal liaisons who interact with Indian tribes and the executive directors of state agencies receive training as described in RCW 43.376.040; and(((4)))(5) Submit an annual report to the governor on activities of the state agency involving Indian tribes and on implementation of this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.376 RCW to read as follows:(1) A state agency may not impose an undue burden or interfere with an Indian tribe's exercise of traditional cultural practices on a tribal traditional cultural place unless it is in furtherance of a compelling governmental interest and is the least restrictive means of furthering that compelling governmental interest.(2) An Indian tribe whose traditional cultural practices have been burdened in violation of this section may assert that violation as a claim in a judicial proceeding and obtain appropriate relief against a state agency. Actions shall be brought in superior court in accordance with chapter 4.92 RCW.(3)(a) The aggrieved party shall have the burden of proving that the agency action having an impact upon the management, use, or preservation of a tribal traditional cultural place, is posing or will pose an undue burden on any aspect of a tribal traditional cultural practice.(b) If the aggrieved party meets its burden of proof under (a) of this subsection, the agency shall have the burden of proving that the governmental interest in the state action is compelling and that the agency chose the least intrusive means for satisfying that governmental interest.(4) In the case of any proceeding involving a tribal traditional cultural place or associated traditional cultural practice of a tribe whose traditional cultural tenets prohibit disclosure of information concerning their traditional cultural places or traditional cultural beliefs or practices, and mandate secrecy and internal sanctions to enforce those prohibitions, and where the tribal government of the affected tribe so certifies, the agency shall have the burden of proving that:(a) It has a compelling governmental interest in pursuing the action as originally proposed;(b) It is essential that the agency's compelling governmental interest be furthered as originally proposed; and(c) None of the less intrusive alternatives identified adequately advance that compelling governmental interest.(5) If an agency does not meet its burden of proof under this section, it shall not proceed with the proposed action.(6) An action against a state agency brought under this section shall be commenced within three years of the agency action.Sec. 4. RCW 43.376.060 and 2012 c 122 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:((Nothing))Except as provided in section 3 of this act, nothing in this chapter creates a right of action against a state agency or a right of review of an action by a state agency.--- END ---